Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-310
Stock; withdrawal; insufficient funds to meet notices; limit of loans; requirements.

So long as any association is delayed in meeting payment to withdrawing members due to insufficient funds applicable to such purpose, any loan made to a member shall be from funds not applicable for payment to withdrawing members, and shall not exceed one-half of the credit value of the member's stock unless secured also by the pledge of real estate. If the only security for such a loan be a pledge of the member's stock, the association shall take from the borrower a note for the payment thereof with interest, payable on demand, and a notice for withdrawal of sufficient of the stock to pay such note and interest unless such notice is already on file, and the association shall not demand payment of such note until it has funds available for the payment of the withdrawal notice in the sequence of its filing.

Laws 1941, c. 12, § 1, p. 84;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-304;

R.S.1943, § 8-310.